Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2110
Certified social work, defined.

Certified social work means the professional application of social work values, knowledge, principles, and methods in all areas of social work practice, except that certified social work shall not include private, independent, and autonomous practice of social work.

Laws 1986, LB 286, § 7;

R.S.1943, (1990), § 71-1,250;

Laws 1993, LB 669, § 22;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,303;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 729.